Maryland, session 2025, SB0438.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
15–118.
(b) (1) [Except] SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION AND
EXCEPT as provided under paragraph [(2)] (3) of this subsection, the Program shall
establish [maximum] MINIMUM reimbursement levels for the drug products for which
there is a generic equivalent authorized under § 12–504 of the Health Occupations Article[,
based on the cost of the generic product].
(2) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (4) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
MINIMUM REIMBURSEMENT LEVELS ESTABLISHED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL BE AT LEAST EQUAL TO THE NATIONAL AVERAGE DRUG
ACQUISITION COST OF THE GENERIC PRODUCT PLUS THE FEE–FOR–SERVICE
PROFESSIONAL DISPENSING FEE DETERMINED BY THE DEPARTMENT IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THE MOST RECENT IN–STATE COST–OF–DISPENSING SURVEY.
[(2)] (3) [If] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (4) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, IF a prescriber directs a specific brand name drug, the reimbursement level
shall be based on the [cost] NATIONAL AVERAGE DRUG ACQUISITION COST of the
brand name product PLUS THE FEE–FOR–SERVICE PROFESSIONAL DISPENSING FEE
DETERMINED BY THE DEPARTMENT IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE MOST RECENT
IN–STATE COST–OF–DISPENSING SURVEY.
(4) PARAGRAPHS (2) AND (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION DO NOT APPLY TO:
(I) A PHARMACY OWNED BY OR UNDER THE SAME CORPORATE
AFFILIATION AS A PHARMACY BENEFITS MANAGER; OR
(II) A MAIL ORDER PHARMACY.
(F) THE PROVISIONS OF § 15–1632 OF THE INSURANCE ARTICLE APPLY TO
A MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION THAT USES A PHARMACY BENEFITS MANAGER TO
MANAGE PRESCRIPTION DRUG COVERAGE BENEFITS ON BEHALF OF THE MANAGED
CARE ORGANIZATION.
Article – Insurance

SENATE BILL 438 3
15–1601.
(s) (1) “Purchaser” means a person that offers a plan or program in the State,
including the State Employee and Retiree Health and Welfare Benefits Program, AN
INSURER, A NONPROFIT HEALTH SERVICE PLAN, OR A HEALTH MAINTENANCE
ORGANIZATION, that:
[(1)] (I) provides prescription drug coverage or benefits in the State; and
[(2)] (II) enters into an agreement with a pharmacy benefits manager for
the provision of pharmacy benefits management services.
(2) “PURCHASER” DOES NOT INCLUDE A NONPROFIT HEALTH
MAINTENANCE ORGANIZATION THAT:
(I) OPERATES AS A GROUP MODEL;
(II) PROVIDES SERVICES SOLELY TO A MEMBER OR PATIENT OF
THE NONPROFIT HEALTH MAINTENANCE ORGANIZATION; AND
(III) FURNISHES SERVICES THROUGH THE INTERNAL PHARMACY
OPERATIONS OF THE NONPROFIT HEALTH MAINTENANCE ORGANIZATION.
15–1632.
A PHARMACY BENEFITS MANAGER THAT CONTRACTS WITH A PHARMACY ON
BEHALF OF A MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION, AS DEFINED IN § 15–101 OF THE
HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE, SHALL REIMBURSE THE PHARMACY AN AMOUNT
THAT IS AT LEAST EQUAL TO THE NATIONAL AVERAGE DRUG ACQUISITION COST
PLUS THE FEE–FOR–SERVICE PROFESSIONAL DISPENSING FEE DETERMINED BY THE
MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH FOR THE MARYLAND MEDICAL ASSISTANCE
PROGRAM IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE MOST RECENT IN–STATE
COST–OF–DISPENSING SURVEY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act is an emergency
measure, is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health or safety, has
been passed by a yea and nay vote supported by three–fifths of all the members elected to
each of the two Houses of the General Assembly, and shall take effect from the date it is
enacted.